lib/vendor/Text_TeXHyphen/hyph_bg_BG.dic
microsoft-cp1251
.ב8
.בב8
.בג8
.בד8
.בה8
.בז8
.בח8
.בי8
.בך8
.בכ8
.בל8
.בם8
.בן8
.בנ8
.בס8
.בע8
.בפ8
.בץ8
.בצ8
.בק8
.בר8
.בש8
.ג8
.גב8
.גבב8
.גבג8
.גבד8
.גבה8
.גבז8
.גבח8
.גבי8
.גבך8
.גבכ8
.גבל8
.גבם8
.גבן8
.גבנ8
.גבס8
.גבע8
.גבפ8
.גבץ8
.גבצ8
.גבק8
.גבר8
.גבש8
.גג8
.גגב8
.גגג8
.גגד8
.גגה8
.גגז8
.גגח8
.גגי8
.גגך8
.גגכ8
.גגל8
.גגם8
.גגן8
.גגנ8
.גגס8
.גגע8
.גגפ8
.גגץ8
.גגצ8
.גגק8
.גגר8
.גגש8
.גד8
.גדב8
.גדג8
.גדד8
.גדה8
.גדז8
.גדח8
.גדי8
.גדך8
.גדכ8
.גדל8
.גדם8
.גדן8
.גדנ8
.גדס8
.גדע8
.גדפ8
.גדץ8
.גדצ8
.גדק8
.גדר8
.גדש8
.גה8
.גהב8
.גהג8
.גהד8
.גהה8
.גהז8
.גהח8
.גהי8
.גהך8
.גהכ8
.גהל8
.גהם8
.גהן8
.גהנ8
.גהס8
.גהע8
.גהפ8
.גהץ8
.גהצ8
.גהק8
.גהר8
.גהש8
.גז8
.גזב8
.גזג8
.גזד8
.גזה8
.גזז8
.גזח8
.גזי8
.גזך8
.גזכ8
.גזל8
.גזם8
.גזן8
.גזנ8
.גזס8
.גזע8
.גזפ8
.גזץ8
.גזצ8
.גזק8
.גזר8
.גזש8
.גח8
.גחב8
.גחג8
.גחד8
.גחה8
.גחז8
.גחח8
.גחי8
.גחך8
.גחכ8
.גחל8
.גחם8
.גחן8
.גחנ8
.גחס8
.גחע8
.גחפ8
.גחץ8
.גחצ8
.גחק8
.גחר8
.גחש8
.גי8
.גיב8
.גיג8
.גיד8
.גיה8
.גיז8
.גיח8
.גיי8
.גיך8
.גיכ8
.גיל8
.גים8
.גין8
.גינ8
.גיס8
.גיע8
.גיפ8
.גיץ8
.גיצ8
.גיק8
.גיר8
.גיש8
.גך8
.גךב8
.גךג8
.גךד8
.גךה8
.גךז8
.גךח8
.גךי8
.גךך8
.גךכ8
.גךל8
.גךם8
.גךן8
.גךנ8
.גךס8
.גךע8
.גךפ8
.גךץ8
.גךצ8
.גךק8
.גךר8
.גךש8
.גכ8
.גכב8
.גכג8
.גכד8
.גכה8
.גכז8
.גכח8
.גכי8
.גכך8
.גככ8
.גכל8
.גכם8
.גכן8
.גכנ8
.גכס8
.גכע8
.גכפ8
.גכץ8
.גכצ8
.גכק8
.גכר8
.גכש8
.גל8
.גלב8
.גלג8
.גלד8
.גלה8
.גלז8
.גלח8
.גלי8
.גלך8
.גלכ8
.גלל8
.גלם8
.גלן8
.גלנ8
.גלס8
.גלע8
.גלפ8
.גלץ8
.גלצ8
.גלק8
.גלר8
.גלש8
.גם8
.גםב8
.גםג8
.גםד8
.גםה8
.גםז8
.גםח8
.גםי8
.גםך8
.גםכ8
.גםל8
.גםם8
.גםן8
.גםנ8
.גםס8
.גםע8
.גםפ8
.גםץ8
.גםצ8
.גםק8
.גםר8
.גםש8
.גן8
.גןב8
.גןג8
.גןד8
.גןה8
.גןז8
.גןח8
.גןי8
.גןך8
.גןכ8
.גןל8
.גןם8
.גןן8
.גןנ8
.גןס8
.גןע8
.גןפ8
.גןץ8
.גןצ8
.גןק8
.גןר8
.גןש8
.גנ8
.גנב8
.גנג8
.גנד8
.גנה8
.גנז8
.גנח8
.גני8
.גנך8
.גנכ8
.גנל8
.גנם8
.גנן8
.גננ8
.גנס8
.גנע8
.גנפ8
.גנץ8
.גנצ8
.גנק8
.גנר8
.גנש8
.גס8
.גסב8
.גסג8
.גסד8
.גסה8
.גסז8
.גסח8
.גסי8
.גסך8
.גסכ8
.גסל8
.גסם8
.גסן8
.גסנ8
.גסס8
.גסע8
.גספ8
.גסץ8
.גסצ8
.גסק8
.גסר8
.גסש8
.גע8
.געב8
.געג8
.געד8
.געה8
.געז8
.געח8
.געי8
.געך8
.געכ8
.געל8
.געם8
.גען8
.גענ8
.געס8
.געע8
.געפ8
.געץ8
.געצ8
.געק8
.גער8
.געש8
.גפ8
.גפב8
.גפג8
.גפד8
.גפה8
.גפז8
.גפח8
.גפי8
.גפך8
.גפכ8
.גפל8
.גפם8
.גפן8
.גפנ8
.גפס8
.גפע8
.גפפ8
.גפץ8
.גפצ8
.גפק8
.גפר8
.גפש8
.גץ8
.גץב8
.גץג8
.גץד8
.גץה8
.גץז8
.גץח8
.גץי8
.גץך8
.גץכ8
.גץל8
.גץם8
.גץן8
.גץנ8
.גץס8
.גץע8
.גץפ8
.גץץ8
.גץצ8
.גץק8
.גץר8
.גץש8
.גצ8
.גצב8
.גצג8
.גצד8
.גצה8
.גצז8
.גצח8
.גצי8
.גצך8
.גצכ8
.גצל8
.גצם8
.גצן8
.גצנ8
.גצס8
.גצע8
.גצפ8
.גצץ8
.גצצ8
.גצק8
.גצר8
.גצש8
.גק8
.גקב8
.גקג8
.גקד8
.גקה8
.גקז8
.גקח8
.גקי8
.גקך8
.גקכ8
.גקל8
.גקם8
.גקן8
.גקנ8
.גקס8
.גקע8
.גקפ8
.גקץ8
.גקצ8
.גקק8
.גקר8
.גקש8
.גר8
.גרב8
.גרג8
.גרד8
.גרה8
.גרז8
.גרח8
.גרי8
.גרך8
.גרכ8
.גרל8
.גרם8
.גרן8
.גרנ8
.גרס8
.גרע8
.גרפ8
.גרץ8
.גרצ8
.גרק8
.גרר8
.גרש8
.גש8
.גשב8
.גשג8
.גשד8
.גשה8
.גשז8
.גשח8
.גשי8
.גשך8
.גשכ8
.גשל8
.גשם8
.גשן8
.גשנ8
.גשס8
.גשע8
.גשפ8
.גשץ8
.גשצ8
.גשק8
.גשר8
.גשש8
.ד8
.דב8
.דג8
.דד8
.דה8
.דז8
.דח8
.די8
.דך8
.דכ8
.דל8
.דם8
.דן8
.דנ8
.דס8
.דע8
.דפ8
.דץ8
.דצ8
.דק8
.דר8
.דש8
.ה8
.הב8
.הג8
.הד8
.הה8
.הז8
.הח8
.הי8
.הך8
.הכ8
.הל8
.הם8
.הן8
.הנ8
.הס8
.הע8
.הפ8
.הץ8
.הצ8
.הק8
.הר8
.הש8
.ז8
.זב8
.זג8
.זד8
.זה8
.זז8
.זח8
.זי8
.זך8
.זכ8
.זל8
.זם8
.זן8
.זנ8
.זס8
.זע8
.זפ8
.זץ8
.זצ8
.זק8
.זר8
.זש8
.ח8
.חב8
.חג8
.חד8
.חה8
.חז8
.חח8
.חי8
.חך8
.חכ8
.חל8
.חם8
.חן8
.חנ8
.חס8
.חע8
.חפ8
.חץ8
.חצ8
.חק8
.חר8
.חש8
.י8
.יב8
.יג8
.יד8
.יה8
.יז8
.יח8
.יי8
.יך8
.יכ8
.יל8
.ים8
.ין8
.ינ8
.יס8
.יע8
.יפ8
.יץ8
.יצ8
.יק8
.יר8
.יש8
.ך8
.ךב8
.ךג8
.ךד8
.ךה8
.ךז8
.ךח8
.ךי8
.ךך8
.ךכ8
.ךל8
.ךם8
.ךן8
.ךנ8
.ךס8
.ךע8
.ךפ8
.ךץ8
.ךצ8
.ךק8
.ךר8
.ךש8
.כ8
.כב8
.כג8
.כד8
.כה8
.כז8
.כח8
.כי8
.כך8
.ככ8
.כל8
.כם8
.כן8
.כנ8
.כס8
.כע8
.כפ8
.כץ8
.כצ8
.כק8
.כר8
.כש8
.ל8
.לב8
.לג8
.לד8
.לה8
.לז8
.לח8
.לי8
.לך8
.לכ8
.לל8
.לם8
.לן8
.לנ8
.לס8
.לע8
.לפ8
.לץ8
.לצ8
.לק8
.לר8
.לש8
.ם8
.םא4ה5ז
.םא4ה5ח
.םא5ה6זאג
.םא5ה6זאס
.םב8
.םג8
.םד8
.םה8
.םז8
.םח8
.םי8
.םך8
.םכ8
.םל8
.םם8
.םן8
.םנ8
.םס8
.םע8
.םפ8
.םץ8
.םצ8
.םק8
.םר8
.םש8
.ן8
.ןב8
.ןג8
.ןד8
.ןה8
.ןז8
.ןח8
.ןי8
.ןך8
.ןכ8
.ןל8
.ןם8
.ןמ4ה5ז
.ןמ4ה5ח
.ןמ5ה6זאג
.ןמ5ה6זףנ
.ןן8
.ןנ8
.ןנו4ה5ז
.ןנו4ה5ח
.ןס8
.ןע8
.ןפ8
.ןץ8
.ןצ8
.ןק8
.ןר8
.ןש8
.נ8
.נב8
.נג8
.נד8
.נה8
.נז8
.נח8
.ני8
.נך8
.נכ8
.נל8
.נם8
.נן8
.ננ8
.נס8
.נע8
.נפ8
.נץ8
.נצ8
.נק8
.נר8
.נש8
.ס8
.סב8
.סבב8
.סבג8
.סבד8
.סבה8
.סבז8
.סבח8
.סבי8
.סבך8
.סבכ8
.סבל8
.סבם8
.סבן8
.סבנ8
.סבס8
.סבע8
.סבפ8
.סבץ8
.סבצ8
.סבק8
.סבר8
.סבש8
.סג8
.סגב8
.סגג8
.סגד8
.סגה8
.סגז8
.סגח8
.סגי8
.סגך8
.סגכ8
.סגל8
.סגם8
.סגן8
.סגנ8
.סגס8
.סגע8
.סגפ8
.סגץ8
.סגצ8
.סגק8
.סגר8
.סגש8
.סד8
.סדב8
.סדג8
.סדד8
.סדה8
.סדז8
.סדח8
.סדי8
.סדך8
.סדכ8
.סדל8
.סדם8
.סדן8
.סדנ8
.סדס8
.סדע8
.סדפ8
.סדץ8
.סדצ8
.סדק8
.סדר8
.סדש8
.סה8
.סהב8
.סהג8
.סהד8
.סהה8
.סהז8
.סהח8
.סהי8
.סהך8
.סהכ8
.סהל8
.סהם8
.סהן8
.סהנ8
.סהס8
.סהע8
.סהפ8
.סהץ8
.סהצ8
.סהק8
.סהר8
.סהש8
.סז8
.סזב8
.סזג8
.סזד8
.סזה8
.סזז8
.סזח8
.סזי8
.סזך8
.סזכ8
.סזל8
.סזם8
.סזן8
.סזנ8
.סזס8
.סזע8
.סזפ8
.סזץ8
.סזצ8
.סזק8
.סזר8
.סזש8
.סח8
.סחב8
.סחג8
.סחד8
.סחה8
.סחז8
.סחח8
.סחי8
.סחך8
.סחכ8
.סחל8
.סחם8
.סחן8
.סחנ8
.סחס8
.סחע8
.סחפ8
.סחץ8
.סחצ8
.סחק8
.סחר8
.סחש8
.סי8
.סיב8
.סיג8
.סיד8
.סיה8
.סיז8
.סיח8
.סיי8
.סיך8
.סיכ8
.סיל8
.סים8
.סין8
.סינ8
.סיס8
.סיע8
.סיפ8
.סיץ8
.סיצ8
.סיק8
.סיר8
.סיש8
.סך8
.סךב8
.סךג8
.סךד8
.סךה8
.סךז8
.סךח8
.סךי8
.סךך8
.סךכ8
.סךל8
.סךם8
.סךן8
.סךנ8
.סךס8
.סךע8
.סךפ8
.סךץ8
.סךצ8
.סךק8
.סךר8
.סךש8
.סכ8
.סכב8
.סכג8
.סכד8
.סכה8
.סכז8
.סכח8
.סכי8
.סכך8
.סככ8
.סכל8
.סכם8
.סכן8
.סכנ8
.סכס8
.סכע8
.סכפ8
.סכץ8
.סכצ8
.סכק8
.סכר8
.סכש8
.סל8
.סלב8
.סלג8
.סלד8
.סלה8
.סלז8
.סלח8
.סלי8
.סלך8
.סלכ8
.סלל8
.סלם8
.סלן8
.סלנ8
.סלס8
.סלע8
.סלפ8
.סלץ8
.סלצ8
.סלק8
.סלר8
.סלש8
.סם8
.סםב8
.סםג8
.סםד8
.סםה8
.סםז8
.סםח8
.סםי8
.סםך8
.סםכ8
.סםל8
.סםם8
.סםן8
.סםנ8
.סםס8
.סםע8
.סםפ8
.סםץ8
.סםצ8
.סםק8
.סםר8
.סםש8
.סן8
.סןב8
.סןג8
.סןד8
.סןה8
.סןז8
.סןח8
.סןי8
.סןך8
.סןכ8
.סןל8
.סןם8
.סןן8
.סןנ8
.סןס8
.סןע8
.סןפ8
.סןץ8
.סןצ8
.סןק8
.סןר8
.סןש8
.סנ8
.סנב8
.סנג8
.סנד8
.סנה8
.סנז8
.סנח8
.סני8
.סנך8
.סנכ8
.סנל8
.סנם8
.סנן8
.סננ8
.סנס8
.סנע8
.סנפ8
.סנץ8
.סנצ8
.סנק8
.סנר8
.סנש8
.סס8
.ססב8
.ססג8
.ססד8
.ססה8
.ססז8
.ססח8
.ססי8
.ססך8
.ססכ8
.ססל8
.ססם8
.ססן8
.ססנ8
.ססס8
.ססע8
.סספ8
.ססץ8
.ססצ8
.ססק8
.ססר8
.ססש8
.סע8
.סעב8
.סעג8
.סעד8
.סעה8
.סעז8
.סעח8
.סעי8
.סעך8
.סעכ8
.סעל8
.סעם8
.סען8
.סענ8
.סעס8
.סעע8
.סעפ8
.סעץ8
.סעצ8
.סעק8
.סער8
.סעש8
.ספ8
.ספב8
.ספג8
.ספד8
.ספה8
.ספז8
.ספח8
.ספי8
.ספך8
.ספכ8
.ספל8
.ספם8
.ספן8
.ספנ8
.ספס8
.ספע8
.ספפ8
.ספץ8
.ספצ8
.ספק8
.ספר8
.ספש8
.סץ8
.סץב8
.סץג8
.סץד8
.סץה8
.סץז8
.סץח8
.סץי8
.סץך8
.סץכ8
.סץל8
.סץם8
.סץן8
.סץנ8
.סץס8
.סץע8
.סץפ8
.סץץ8
.סץצ8
.סץק8
.סץר8
.סץש8
.סצ8
.סצב8
.סצג8
.סצד8
.סצה8
.סצז8
.סצח8
.סצי8
.סצך8
.סצכ8
.סצל8
.סצם8
.סצן8
.סצנ8
.סצס8
.סצע8
.סצפ8
.סצץ8
.סצצ8
.סצק8
.סצר8
.סצש8
.סק8
.סקב8
.סקג8
.סקד8
.סקה8
.סקז8
.סקח8
.סקי8
.סקך8
.סקכ8
.סקל8
.סקם8
.סקן8
.סקנ8
.סקס8
.סקע8
.סקפ8
.סקץ8
.סקצ8
.סקק8
.סקר8
.סקש8
.סר8
.סרב8
.סרג8
.סרד8
.סרה8
.סרז8
.סרח8
.סרי8
.סרך8
.סרכ8
.סרל8
.סרם8
.סרן8
.סרנ8
.סרס8
.סרע8
.סרפ8
.סרץ8
.סרצ8
.סרק8
.סרר8
.סרש8
.סש8
.סשב8
.סשג8
.סשד8
.סשה8
.סשז8
.סשח8
.סשי8
.סשך8
.סשכ8
.סשל8
.סשם8
.סשן8
.סשנ8
.סשס8
.סשע8
.סשפ8
.סשץ8
.סשצ8
.סשק8
.סשר8
.סשש8
.ע8
.עב8
.עג8
.עד8
.עה8
.עז8
.עח8
.עי8
.עך8
.עכ8
.על8
.עם8
.ען8
.ענ8
.עס8
.עע8
.עפ8
.עץ8
.עצ8
.עק8
.ער8
.עש8
.פ8
.פב8
.פג8
.פד8
.פה8
.פז8
.פח8
.פי8
.פך8
.פכ8
.פל8
.פם8
.פן8
.פנ8
.פס8
.פע8
.פפ8
.פץ8
.פצ8
.פק8
.פר8
.פש8
.ץ8
.ץב8
.ץג8
.ץד8
.ץה8
.ץז8
.ץח8
.ץי8
.ץך8
.ץכ8
.ץל8
.ץם8
.ץן8
.ץנ8
.ץס8
.ץע8
.ץפ8
.ץץ8
.ץצ8
.ץק8
.ץר8
.ץש8
.צ8
.צב8
.צג8
.צד8
.צה8
.צז8
.צח8
.צי8
.צך8
.צכ8
.צל8
.צם8
.צן8
.צנ8
.צס8
.צע8
.צפ8
.צץ8
.צצ8
.צק8
.צר8
.צש8
.ק8
.קב8
.קג8
.קד8
.קה8
.קז8
.קח8
.קי8
.קך8
.קכ8
.קל8
.קם8
.קן8
.קנ8
.קס8
.קע8
.קפ8
.קץ8
.קצ8
.קק8
.קר8
.קש8
.ר8
.רב8
.רג8
.רד8
.רה8
.רז8
.רח8
.רי8
.רך8
.רכ8
.רל8
.רם8
.רן8
.רנ8
.רס8
.רע8
.רפ8
.רץ8
.רצ8
.רק8
.רר8
.רש8
.ש8
.שב8
.שג8
.שד8
.שה8
.שז8
.שח8
.שי8
.שך8
.שכ8
.של8
.שם8
.שן8
.שנ8
.שס8
.שע8
.שפ8
.שץ8
.שצ8
.שק8
.שר8
.שש8
4בב4
4בן4
4גג4
4גפ4
4דד4
4דך4
4הה4
4הע4
4זז4
4זר4
4חח4
4חס4
4יי4
4ךד4
4ךך4
4ככ4
4לל4
4םם4
4ןב4
4ןן4
4ננ4
4סח4
4סס4
4עה4
4עע4
4פג4
4פפ4
4ץץ4
4צצ4
4צק4
4קצ4
4קק4
4רז4
4רר4
4שש4
8ב.
8ג.
8ד.
8ה.
8ז.
8ח.
8י.
8ך.
8ךס.
8ךע.
8כ.
8ל.
8ם.
8ן.
8נ.
8ס.
8סע.
8ע.
8פ.
8ץ.
8צ.
8ק.
8ר.
8ש.
8ü8
א1
א2ב
א2ג
א2ד
א2ה
א2ז
א2ח
א2י
א2ך
א2כ
א2ל
א2ם
א2ן
א2נ
א2ס
א2ע
א2פ
א2ץ
א2צ
א2ק
א2ר
א2ש
א3בא
א3בו
א3בט
א3במ
א3בף
א3בת
א3בü
א3ב‏
א3בÿ
א3גא
א3גו
א3גט
א3גמ
א3גף
א3גת
א3גü
א3ג‏
א3גÿ
א3דא
א3דו
א3דט
א3דמ
א3דף
א3דת
א3דü
א3ד‏
א3דÿ
א3הא
א3הו
א3הזא
א3הזו
א3הזט
א3הזמ
א3הזף
א3הזת
א3הזü
א3הז‏
א3הזÿ
א3החא
א3החו
א3החט
א3החמ
א3החף
א3החת
א3החü
א3הח‏
א3החÿ
א3הט
א3המ
א3הף
א3הת
א3הü
א3ה‏
א3הÿ
א3זא
א3זו
א3זט
א3זמ
א3זף
א3זת
א3זü
א3ז‏
א3זÿ
א3חא
א3חו
א3חט
א3חמ
א3חף
א3חת
א3חü
א3ח‏
א3חÿ
א3יא
א3יו
א3יט
א3ימ
א3יף
א3ית
א3יü
א3י‏
א3יÿ
א3ךא
א3ךו
א3ךט
א3ךמ
א3ךף
א3ךת
א3ךü
א3ך‏
א3ךÿ
א3כא
א3כו
א3כט
א3כמ
א3כף
א3כת
א3כü
א3כ‏
א3כÿ
א3לא
א3לו
א3לט
א3למ
א3לף
א3לת
א3לü
א3ל‏
א3לÿ
א3םא
א3םו
א3םט
א3םמ
א3םף
א3םת
א3םü
א3ם‏
א3םÿ
א3ןא
א3ןו
א3ןט
א3ןמ
א3ןף
א3ןת
א3ןü
א3ן‏
א3ןÿ
א3נא
א3נו
א3נט
א3נמ
א3נף
א3נת
א3נü
א3נ‏
א3נÿ
א3סא
א3סו
א3סט
א3סמ
א3סף
א3סת
א3סü
א3ס‏
א3סÿ
א3עא
א3עו
א3עט
א3עמ
א3עף
א3עת
א3עü
א3ע‏
א3עÿ
א3פא
א3פו
א3פט
א3פמ
א3פף
א3פת
א3פü
א3פ‏
א3פÿ
א3ץא
א3ץו
א3ץט
א3ץמ
א3ץף
א3ץת
א3ץü
א3ץ‏
א3ץÿ
א3צא
א3צו
א3צט
א3צמ
א3צף
א3צת
א3צü
א3צ‏
א3צÿ
א3קא
א3קו
א3קט
א3קמ
א3קף
א3קת
א3קü
א3ק‏
א3קÿ
א3רא
א3רו
א3רט
א3רמ
א3רף
א3רת
א3רü
א3ר‏
א3רÿ
א3שא
א3שו
א3שט
א3שמ
א3שף
א3שת
א3שü
א3ש‏
א3שÿ
אאא4
אאו4
אאט4
אאמ4
אאף4
אאת4
אא‏4
אאÿ4
אוא4
אוו4
אוט4
אומ4
אוף4
אות4
או‏4
אוÿ4
אטא4
אטו4
אטט4
אטמ4
אטף4
אטת4
אט‏4
אטÿ4
אמא4
אמו4
אמט4
אממ4
אמף4
אמת4
אמ‏4
אמÿ4
אףא4
אףו4
אףט4
אףמ4
אףף4
אףת4
אף‏4
אףÿ4
אתא4
אתו4
אתט4
אתמ4
אתף4
אתת4
את‏4
אתÿ4
א‏א4
א‏ו4
א‏ט4
א‏מ4
א‏ף4
א‏ת4
א‏‏4
א‏ÿ4
אÿא4
אÿו4
אÿט4
אÿמ4
אÿף4
אÿת4
אÿ‏4
אÿÿ4
ב1
ב2א
ב2ו
ב2ט
ב2מ
ב2ף
ב2ת
ב2‏
ב2ÿ
בבב8
בבג8
בבד8
בבה8
בבז8
בבח8
בבי8
בבך8
בבכ8
בבל8
בבם8
בבן8
בבנ8
בבס8
בבע8
בבפ8
בבץ8
בבצ8
בבק8
בבר8
בבש8
בגב8
בגג8
בגד8
בגה8
בגז8
בגח8
בגי8
בגך8
בגכ8
בגל8
בגם8
בגן8
בגנ8
בגס8
בגע8
בגפ8
בגץ8
בגצ8
בגק8
בגר8
בגש8
בדב8
בדג8
בדד8
בדה8
בדז8
בדח8
בדי8
בדך8
בדכ8
בדל8
בדם8
בדן8
בדנ8
בדס8
בדע8
בדפ8
בדץ8
בדצ8
בדק8
בדר8
בדש8
בהב8
בהג8
בהד8
בהה8
בהז8
בהח8
בהי8
בהך8
בהכ8
בהל8
בהם8
בהן8
בהנ8
בהס8
בהע8
בהפ8
בהץ8
בהצ8
בהק8
בהר8
בהש8
בזב8
בזג8
בזד8
בזה8
בזז8
בזח8
בזי8
בזך8
בזכ8
בזל8
בזם8
בזן8
בזנ8
בזס8
בזע8
בזפ8
בזץ8
בזצ8
בזק8
בזר8
בזש8
בחב8
בחג8
בחד8
בחה8
בחז8
בחח8
בחי8
בחך8
בחכ8
בחל8
בחם8
בחן8
בחנ8
בחס8
בחע8
בחפ8
בחץ8
בחצ8
בחק8
בחר8
בחש8
בי4
ביב8
ביג8
ביד8
ביה8
ביז8
ביח8
ביי8
ביך8
ביכ8
ביל8
בים8
בין8
בינ8
ביס8
ביע8
ביפ8
ביץ8
ביצ8
ביק8
ביר8
ביש8
בךב8
בךג8
בךד8
בךה8
בךז8
בךח8
בךי8
בךך8
בךכ8
בךל8
בךם8
בךן8
בךנ8
בךס8
בךע8
בךפ8
בךץ8
בךצ8
בךק8
בךר8
בךש8
בכ4
בכב8
בכג8
בכד8
בכה8
בכז8
בכח8
בכי8
בכך8
בככ8
בכל8
בכם8
בכן8
בכנ8
בכס8
בכע8
בכפ8
בכץ8
בכצ8
בכק8
בכר8
בכש8
בל4
בלב8
בלג8
בלד8
בלה8
בלז8
בלח8
בלי8
בלך8
בלכ8
בלל8
בלם8
בלן8
בלנ8
בלס8
בלע8
בלפ8
בלץ8
בלצ8
בלק8
בלר8
בלש8
בם4
בםב8
בםג8
בםד8
בםה8
בםז8
בםח8
בםי8
בםך8
בםכ8
בםל8
בםם8
בםן8
בםנ8
בםס8
בםע8
בםפ8
בםץ8
בםצ8
בםק8
בםר8
בםש8
בןב8
בןג8
בןד8
בןה8
בןז8
בןח8
בןי8
בןך8
בןכ8
בןל8
בןם8
בןן8
בןנ8
בןס8
בןע8
בןפ8
בןץ8
בןצ8
בןק8
בןר8
בןש8
בנ4
בנב8
בנג8
בנד8
בנה8
בנז8
בנח8
בני8
בנך8
בנכ8
בנל8
בנם8
בנן8
בננ8
בנס8
בנע8
בנפ8
בנץ8
בנצ8
בנק8
בנר8
בנש8
בסב8
בסג8
בסד8
בסה8
בסז8
בסח8
בסי8
בסך8
בסכ8
בסל8
בסם8
בסן8
בסנ8
בסס8
בסע8
בספ8
בסץ8
בסצ8
בסק8
בסר8
בסש8
בעב8
בעג8
בעד8
בעה8
בעז8
בעח8
בעי8
בעך8
בעכ8
בעל8
בעם8
בען8
בענ8
בעס8
בעע8
בעפ8
בעץ8
בעצ8
בעק8
בער8
בעש8
בפב8
בפג8
בפד8
בפה8
בפז8
בפח8
בפי8
בפך8
בפכ8
בפל8
בפם8
בפן8
בפנ8
בפס8
בפע8
בפפ8
בפץ8
בפצ8
בפק8
בפר8
בפש8
בץב8
בץג8
בץד8
בץה8
בץז8
בץח8
בץי8
בץך8
בץכ8
בץל8
בץם8
בץן8
בץנ8
בץס8
בץע8
בץפ8
בץץ8
בץצ8
בץק8
בץר8
בץש8
בצב8
בצג8
בצד8
בצה8
בצז8
בצח8
בצי8
בצך8
בצכ8
בצל8
בצם8
בצן8
בצנ8
בצס8
בצע8
בצפ8
בצץ8
בצצ8
בצק8
בצר8
בצש8
בקב8
בקג8
בקד8
בקה8
בקז8
בקח8
בקי8
בקך8
בקכ8
בקל8
בקם8
בקן8
בקנ8
בקס8
בקע8
בקפ8
בקץ8
בקצ8
בקק8
בקר8
בקש8
ברב8
ברג8
ברד8
ברה8
ברז8
ברח8
ברי8
ברך8
ברכ8
ברל8
ברם8
ברן8
ברנ8
ברס8
ברע8
ברפ8
ברץ8
ברצ8
ברק8
ברר8
ברש8
בשב8
בשג8
בשד8
בשה8
בשז8
בשח8
בשי8
בשך8
בשכ8
בשל8
בשם8
בשן8
בשנ8
בשס8
בשע8
בשפ8
בשץ8
בשצ8
בשק8
בשר8
בשש8
ג1
ג2א
ג2ו
ג2ט
ג2מ
ג2ף
ג2ת
ג2‏
ג2ÿ
גי4
גכ4
גל4
גם4
גנ4
ד1
ד2א
ד2ו
ד2ט
ד2מ
ד2ף
ד2ת
ד2‏
ד2ÿ
די4
דכ4
דל4
דם4
דנ4
ה1
ה2א
ה2ו
ה2ט
ה2מ
ה2ף
ה2ת
ה2‏
ה2ÿ
ה4ז
ה4ח
הבב8
הבג8
הבד8
הבה8
הבז8
הבח8
הבי8
הבך8
הבכ8
הבל8
הבם8
הבן8
הבנ8
הבס8
הבע8
הבפ8
הבץ8
הבצ8
הבק8
הבר8
הבש8
הגב8
הגג8
הגד8
הגה8
הגז8
הגח8
הגי8
הגך8
הגכ8
הגל8
הגם8
